Hawaii statutes.
[§501-243] Dual recording involving
leasehold time share interests. Nothing in this part shall prevent or
prohibit the registration of an instrument which assigns or affects both:

(1) One or more leasehold time share interests; and

(2) One or more interests in registered land other
than a leasehold time share interest. [L 1998, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next